Hawaii statutes.
[§342J-19] Other powers of department not
affected. The powers, duties, and functions vested in the department under
this chapter shall not be construed to affect in any manner the powers, duties,
and functions vested in the department under any other law. [L 1989, c 212, pt
of §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next